Utah statutes.
41-12a-510.   Report, findings, action, and security as evidence.

Neither the report required under Section 41-12a-502, nor the department's findings, action, or requirement of post-accident security under this chapter may be referred to in any way, nor be any evidence of negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

